District of Columbia statutes.
7-2208

Annual report.

The Homeland Security and Emergency Management Agency, through the Mayor of the District of Columbia, shall submit to the Senate and House of Representatives on the 1st day of each regular session of the Congress a report of its activities and expenditures under this chapter.

Aug. 11, 1950, 64 Stat. 440, ch. 686, § 6
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-262,§ 101(d), 54 DCR 794
1981 Ed., § 6-1408.
1973 Ed., § 6-1206.
D.C. Law 16-262, substituted “Homeland Security and Emergency Management Agency” for “Office of Emergency Preparedness”.
Pursuant to Mayor’s Order 98-198 ( 46 DCR 240) pub. January 8, 1999, the name of the Office of Emergency Preparedness has been changed to the D.C. Emergency Management Agency.
Office of Civil Defense abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 7-2202.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.